Missouri, session 2026, SB1515.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 198, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 198.700, to read as
follows:
198.700. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Facility", an independent living facility or a
long-term care facility;
(2) "Independent living facility", a communal living
structure in which at least fifty percent of the residents
are fifty-five years of age or older that provides its
residents with on-site access to dining, transportation,
medical care, and basic housekeeping and laundry services
and that is not licensed by the state;
(3) "Long-term care facility", any facility licensed
under this chapter;
(4) "Referral agency", an individual or entity that
provides referrals to a facility for a fee that is collected
from the facility or for a fee that is collected from a
prospective resident or the legal representative of a
prospective resident. The term "referral agency" shall not

SB 1515 2
include a facility or its employees, a family member of a
resident of a facility, or a resident of a facility
regardless of whether the resident who refers a prospective
resident to a facility receives a discount or other
remuneration from the facility.
2. A referral agency shall provide to a prospective
resident or the legal representative of the prospective
resident referred to a facility:
(1) Written or electronic documentation of any
agreement, including any agreement to terms and conditions,
or acknowledgment or consent for services between the
referral agency and the prospective resident or legal
representative of the prospective resident; and
(2) Written or electronic disclosure of:
(a) Any existing relationship between the referral
agency and the facility, including common ownership or
control of the facility and financial, business, management,
or familial relationships between the referral agency and
the facility;
(b) Any fee that the referral agency receives from the
facility for the referral and a detailed description of the
services provided by the referral agency in exchange for the
fee paid by the facility;
(c) The right of the prospective resident or legal
representative of the prospective resident to terminate the
referral agency's services for any reason at any time
without a fee or other penalty for such termination and with
notice of the termination provided by the referral agency to
all facilities to which the prospective resident has been
referred;
(d) The right of the prospective resident or legal
representative of the prospective resident to request not to

SB 1515 3
be contacted in the future by the referral agency or any
entity to which the referral agency has distributed the
prospective resident's information;
(e) The right of the prospective resident or legal
representative of the prospective resident to receive the
referral agency's privacy policy upon request to the
referral agency; and
(f) The referral agency's possible distribution of the
prospective resident's information to other entities that
may call and solicit the prospective resident to purchase
goods and services.
3. The referral agency and the prospective resident or
legal representative of the prospective resident shall sign
and date, in writing or electronically, the disclosure
required in subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this
section. The referral agency shall provide a written or
electronic copy of the signed disclosure to the facility on
or before the date the resident becomes an occupant of or is
admitted to the facility.
4. No referral agency shall charge a fee or other
penalty to any facility resulting from the termination of an
agreement by a prospective resident or legal representative
of a prospective resident.
5. The facility shall:
(1) Not pay the referral agency a fee until such
facility receives the written or electronic disclosure
required in subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section
and the resident becomes an occupant of or is admitted to
the facility;
(2) Not pay the referral agency a fee after the date
on which the agreement between the referral agency and the

SB 1515 4
prospective resident or legal representative of the
prospective resident is terminated; and
(3) Not sell or transfer the prospective resident's or
prospective resident's legal representative's contact
information to a third party without the written consent of
the prospective resident or legal representative of the
prospective resident.
6. A referral agency that violates this section is
subject to a civil penalty of up to five hundred dollars per
violation.
7. The attorney general or a prosecuting or circuit
attorney may bring a civil action on behalf of the state to
seek the imposition of a civil penalty for a violation of
this section or to enjoin the continuance of the violation
by the referral agency.
✓